Tennessee, session 114, HB1358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The department of children's services shall study the need for a new
juvenile detention facility to be constructed in the western grand division of this state that would
serve the detention and treatment needs of juveniles in that grand division. The department
shall report its findings and recommendations to the judiciary committee of the senate and the
committee having jurisdiction over criminal justice in the house of representatives on or before
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1358
001280
- 1 -